New York, session 2025-2026, S7055.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 800 of the tax law, as added by 2 section 1 of part C of chapter 25 of the laws of 2009, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 (a) Metropolitan commuter transportation district. The metropolitan 5 commuter transportation district ("MCTD") means the area of the state 6 included in the district created and governed by section twelve hundred 7 sixty-two of the public authorities law, excluding the counties of 8 Orange and Rockland for the purposes of this article. 9 § 2. Subparagraph (A) of paragraph 1 of subsection (a) of section 801 10 of the tax law, as amended by section 1 of part Q of chapter 58 of the 11 laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 12 (A) For employers who engage in business within the MCTD, in the coun- 13 ties of Dutchess, Nassau, [Orange,] Putnam, [Rockland,] Suffolk and 14 Westchester, the tax is imposed at a rate of (i) eleven hundredths (.11) 15 percent of the payroll expense for employers with payroll expense no 16 greater than three hundred seventy-five thousand dollars in any calendar 17 quarter, (ii) twenty-three hundredths (.23) percent of the payroll 18 expense for employers with payroll expense greater than three hundred 19 seventy-five thousand dollars and no greater than four hundred thirty- 20 seven thousand five hundred dollars in any calendar quarter, and (iii) 21 thirty-four hundredths (.34) percent of the payroll expense for employ- 22 ers with payroll expense in excess of four hundred thirty-seven thousand 23 five hundred dollars in any calendar quarter. If the employer is a 24 professional employer organization, as defined in section nine hundred EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11384-01-5 S. 7055 2 1 sixteen of the labor law, the employer's tax shall be calculated by 2 determining the payroll expense attributable to each client who has 3 entered into a professional employer agreement with such organization 4 and the payroll expense attributable to such organization itself, multi- 5 plying each of those payroll expense amounts by the applicable rate set 6 forth in this paragraph and adding those products together. 7 § 3. The opening paragraph of subparagraph (A) of paragraph 2 of 8 subsection (a) of section 801 of the tax law, as amended by section 1 of 9 part C of chapter 59 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 10 For individuals, the tax is imposed at a rate of thirty-four 11 hundredths (.34) percent of the net earnings from self-employment of 12 individuals that are attributable to the MCTD, in the counties of Dutch- 13 ess, Nassau, [Orange,] Putnam, [Rockland,] Suffolk, and Westchester, if 14 such earnings attributable to the MCTD exceed fifty thousand dollars for 15 the tax year. 16 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxable 17 years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.